District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.13

Duties of registered agent.

The only duties of a registered agent under this subchapter are:

(1)

Forward to the represented entity at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the entity any process, notice, or demand that is served on the agent;

(2)

Provide the notices required by this title to the entity at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the entity;

(3)

If the agent is a noncommercial registered agent, keep current the information required by § 29-104.04(a) in the most recent registered agent filing for the entity; and

(4)

If the agent is a commercial registered agent, keep current the information listed for it under § 29-104.05(a).

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(27), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “only duties of a registered agent under this subchapter are” for “duties of a registered agent shall be” in the introductory language.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.